Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-3306
Other entity; fluoride added to water supply; rules and regulations.

Any public or private entity not included in section 71-3305 which provides a water supply for human consumption and which is not required to add fluoride to such water supply may add fluoride to such water supply in the amount and manner prescribed by the rules and regulations of the Department of Health and Human Services.

Laws 1973, LB 449, § 2;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 645;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 560.